sv: Batterimonteringstyp: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligent Flight Battery; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Övrigt
it: Tipo di montaggio della batteria: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Batteria di volo intelligente; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Altro
tr: Pil montaj tipi: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Akıllı Uçuş Bataryası; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Diğer
da: Batterimonteringstype: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligent flyvebatteri; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Andet
zh-CN: 电池安装类型: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; 金口; 智能飞行电池; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V口; 其他
ja: バッテリー取り付けタイプ: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; ゴールドマウント; インテリジェントフライトバッテリー; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; Vマウント; その他
ko: 배터리 장착 유형: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; 골드 마운트; 지능형 플라이트 배터리; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V 마운트; 기타
es: Tipo de montaje de la batería: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Montaje dorado; Batería de vuelo inteligente; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; Montaje en V; Otros
nl: Type batterijmontage: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligente vluchtaccu; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Andere
ro-RO: Tip de montare a bateriei: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Baterie de zbor inteligentă; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Altele
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งแบตเตอรี่: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; โกลด์เมาท์; แบตเตอรี่บินอัจฉริยะ; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; วีเมาท์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 電池安裝類型: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; 金接座; 智能飛行電池; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V 接座; 其他
fi: Akun asennustyyppi: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Älykäs lentoakku; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Muu
fr: Type de montage de la batterie: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Batterie de vol intelligente; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Autre
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на батерията: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Интелигентна полетна батерия; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Други
nb: Batterimonteringstype: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligent Flight Battery; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Annet
ru: Тип монтажа батареи: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Интеллектуальный полетный аккумулятор; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Другой
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης μπαταρίας: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Έξυπνη μπαταρία πτήσης; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da bateria: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Bateria de voo inteligente; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Outro
de: Batterie-Montagetyp: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligente Flugbatterie; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Baterijos montavimo tipas: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Išmanioji skrydžio baterija; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Kita
hr-HR: Tip montaže baterije: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Inteligentna baterija za letenje; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Ostalo
sl-SI: Tip montaže baterije: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Inteligentna letalska baterija; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ montáže batérie: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Inteligentná letová batéria; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Iné
en: Battery mounting type: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligent Flight Battery; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Other
hu: Akkumulátor rögzítési típusa: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Intelligens repülési akkumulátor; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da bateria: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Montagem dourada; Bateria de voo inteligente; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; Montagem em V; Outro
cs: Typ montáže baterie: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Inteligentní letová baterie; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Jiné
vi: Kiểu giá đỡ pin: Bp-scl; Bp-u; En-el; Gold mount; Pin bay thông minh; Lp-e; Np-bx1; Np-f; Tb50; V-mount; Khác
pl: Typ montażu akumulatora: BP-SCL; BP-U; EN-EL; Gold Mount; Inteligentny akumulator lotniczy; LP-E; NP-BX1; NP-F; TB50; V-Mount; Inne